Tennessee, session 114, SB0779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-211-843, is amended by adding
"The department must make the catalog of materials available on the department's website."
after the first sentence.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0779
001474
- 1 -